Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1129
Jurisdiction of court.

A court which finds a subject to be in need of court-ordered custody and treatment shall have concurrent jurisdiction to hear and decide issues regarding appointment or replacement of a guardian for as long as the subject is in court-ordered custody and treatment.

Laws 2005, LB 206, § 29.